Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Chapter 4. Scenic Rivers Act.
§ 10.1-412.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River.

The Historic Falls of the James from Orleans Street extended in the City of Richmond westward to the 1970 corporate limits of the city is hereby designated as the Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1972, c. 404, § 10-176; 1984, cc. 176, 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the City of Richmond and appointments to the Falls of the James Advisory Board; redesignated former subsections D and E as present subsections B and C; and twice substituted “that” for “which” in present subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsections B and C, pertaining to reconstruction, etc., at the Byrd Park and Hollywood Hydroelectric Power Stations, and constructing or reconstructing floodwalls or public common carrier facilities that may traverse the river, respectively.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 235 rewrote the section, which read: “The Historic Falls of the James from Orleans Street extended in the City of Richmond westward to the 1970 corporate limits of the city is hereby designated as the Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.”

§ 10.1-412.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River.

The Historic Falls of the James in the City of Richmond, from the western 1970 corporate limits of the city to Orleans Street extended, a distance of approximately eight miles, is hereby designated as the Historic Falls of the James State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1972, c. 404, § 10-176; 1984, cc. 176, 739; 1985, c. 346; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273; 2022, c. 235.

§ 10.1-413.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) James State Scenic River.

The James River in Botetourt and Rockbridge Counties, including the Towns of Buchanan and Glasgow, from its origination at the confluence of the Jackson and Cowpasture Rivers running approximately 59 miles southeastward to the Rockbridge-Amherst-Bedford County line and the James River in Albemarle, Buckingham, and Fluvanna Counties from one mile upstream of Warren boat ramp running approximately 20 miles to New Canton are hereby designated as the James State Scenic River, components of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1985, c. 501, § 10-173.9; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2017, cc. 149, 549; 2018, c. 273; 2020, c. 319.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “and Rockbridge Counties, including the Towns of Buchanan and Glasgow, from its origination at the confluence of the Jackson and Cowpasture Rivers” for “County, from a point two miles southeast of the point where Route 43 (old Route 220) crosses the James River at Eagle Rock,” “59” for “14” and “Rockbridge-Amherst-Bedford County line” for “point where Route 630 crosses the James River at Springwood” to correct an error in the 2018 act.

Acts
2022, c. 175, cl. 2 provides:” That the provisions of Chapter 4 ( §

10.1-400

et seq.) of Title 10.1 of the Code of Virginia shall not apply prior to July 1, 2027, to any water supply project undertaken by a locality or authority within the portion of the James State Scenic River designated as a state scenic river pursuant to this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “14” for “fourteen” in subsection A; deleted former subsection B, concerning administration by the Botetourt County Board of Supervisors; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 149 and 549 are identical, and rewrote subsection A, which read “That portion of the James River in Botetourt County, from a point two miles southeast of the point where Route 43 (old Route 220) crosses the James River at Eagle Rock running approximately 14 miles southeastward to the point where Route 630 crosses the James River at Springwood is hereby designated a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System”; and inserted “or Rockbridge” in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the James State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “No dam or other structure that impedes the natural flow of the James River in Botetourt or Rockbridge County shall be constructed, operated, or maintained within the section of the James River designated as a scenic river by this statute unless specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 319, rewrote the section, which read: “That portion of the James River in Botetourt and Rockbridge Counties, including the Towns of Buchanan and Glasgow, from its origination at the confluence of the Jackson and Cowpasture Rivers running approximately 59 miles southeastward to the Rockbridge-Amherst-Bedford County line is hereby designated as the James State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 175 inserted “Nelson, Appomattox”; and substituted “the confluence of Allens Creek running approximately 57 miles to Stearnes” for “one mile upstream of Warren boat ramp running approximately 20 miles to New Canton”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 10.1-413.
(Effective July 1, 2022) James State Scenic River.

The James River in Botetourt and Rockbridge Counties, including the Towns of Buchanan and Glasgow, from its origination at the confluence of the Jackson and Cowpasture Rivers running approximately 59 miles southeastward to the Rockbridge-Amherst-Bedford County line and the James River in Nelson, Appomattox, Albemarle, Buckingham, and Fluvanna Counties from the confluence of Allens Creek running approximately 57 miles to Stearnes are hereby designated as the James State Scenic River, components of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1985, c. 501, § 10-173.9; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 240; 2017, cc. 149, 549; 2018, c. 273; 2020, c. 319; 2022, c. 175.

§ 10.1-413.1.
Moormans State Scenic River.

The Moormans River in Albemarle County, from the Charlottesville Reservoir to its junction with the Mechums River, is hereby designated as the Moormans State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1988, cc. 21, 300, 891; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the County of Albemarle, and appointments to the Moormans Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Moormans State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “No dam or other structure impeding the natural flow of the river shall be constructed, operated, or maintained unless specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly.”

§ 10.1-413.2.
North Landing and Tributaries State Scenic River.

The North Landing from the North Carolina line to the bridge at Route 165, the Pocaty River from its junction with the North Landing River to the Blackwater Road bridge, West Neck Creek from the junction with the North Landing River to Indian River Road bridge, and Blackwater Creek from the junction with the North Landing River to the confluence, approximately 4.2 miles, of an unnamed tributary approximately 1.75 miles, more or less, west of Blackwater Road, are hereby designated as the North Landing and Tributaries State Scenic River, components of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1988, cc. 490, 891; 1989, c. 656; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the North Landing and Tributaries Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “the North Landing and Tributaries State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “No dam or other structure impeding the natural flow of the river shall be constructed, operated, or maintained unless specifically authorized by an act of the General Assembly.”

§ 10.1-413.3.
Dan State Scenic River.

The Dan River from Berry Hill Road at Route 880 in Pittsylvania County to the downstream property boundary of Abreu/Grogan Park in Danville, a distance of approximately 15 miles, and the Dan River from the North Carolina-Virginia state line in Halifax County to the confluence with Aaron’s Creek in Halifax County, a distance of approximately 38.6 miles, are hereby designated as the Dan State Scenic River, components of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2013, c. 705; 2015, c. 46; 2018, c. 273.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 46 substituted “and the Dan River from the North Carolina-Virginia state line in Halifax County to the confluence with Aaron’s Creek in Halifax County, a distance of approximately 38.6 miles, are hereby designated as components” for “is hereby designated a component” in subsection A and substituted “areas” for “area” in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Dan State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge in the designated areas.”

§ 10.1-414.
Nottoway State Scenic River.

The Nottoway River in Sussex County and Southampton County, from the Route 40 bridge at Stony Creek to the North Carolina line, a distance of approximately 72.5 miles, is hereby designated as the Nottoway State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.6; 1985, cc. 346, 448; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 183; 2003, c. 240; 2011, cc. 96, 136; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted the subsection A designation; and deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, and appointments to the Nottoway State Scenic River Advisory Board.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 96 and 136 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “North Carolina line” for “Careys Bridge at Route 653” and “72.5 miles” for “39 1/2 miles”; and added the last paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Nottoway State Scenic River”; and deleted the former second paragraph, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any transportation or public water supply project.”

§ 10.1-415.
Rappahannock State Scenic River.

The mainstem of the Rappahannock River in Rappahannock, Culpeper, Fauquier, Stafford, Spotsylvania, Caroline, King George, Westmoreland, Essex, and Richmond Counties and the City of Fredericksburg from its headwaters near Chester Gap to the Essex-Middlesex and Richmond-Lancaster County lines, a distance of approximately 165 river miles, is hereby designated as the Rappahannock State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1985, c. 124, § 10-173.8; 1988, c. 891; 1990, c. 225; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 399.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 substituted “86” for “eighty-six” in subsection A; deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries and appointments to the Rappahannock Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsections D through G as present subsections B through E.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Rappahannock State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsections B through E, pertaining to continued operation, etc., of existing dams, continued operation, etc., of the Embrey Dam or its appurtenances, construction, etc., of any road, bridge or intake structures by certain counties, and construction, etc., of natural gas pipeline case number PUE 860065, respectively.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 399, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “Caroline, King George, Westmoreland, Essex, and Richmond”; substituted “Essex-Middlesex and Richmond-Lancaster County lines” for “Ferry Farm-Mayfield Bridge” and “165” for “86”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 10.1-415.1.
Rockfish State Scenic River.

The Rockfish River in Albemarle and Nelson Counties from the Route 693 bridge in Schuyler to its confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately 9.75 miles, is hereby designated as the Rockfish State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1990, cc. 381, 422; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the Rockfish State Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Rockfish State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which read “Nothing in this chapter shall preclude the Commonwealth or local governing body from constructing or reconstructing any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-416.
Rivanna State Scenic River.

The river, stream, or waterway known as the Rivanna from the base of the South Fork Rivanna River reservoir to the junction of the Rivanna with the James River, a distance of approximately 46 miles, is hereby designated as the Rivanna State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.1; 1988, cc. 20, 299, 891; 2003, c. 240; 2009, c. 541; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department and appointments to the Rivanna Scenic River Advisory Board; and redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 541, in subsection A, substituted “South Fork Rivanna River reservoir” for “dam of the woolen mills in the City of Charlottesville” and “46 miles” for “37 miles” and inserted “as” following “designated”; and added subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “State” preceding “Scenic River”; and deleted former subsections B and C, pertaining to dams or other structures, and construction, etc., of roads or bridges.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-579. Deeds of Easement to Local Government for Natural Open Space, Conservation or Rural Preservation.

§ 10.1-417.
Shenandoah State Scenic River.

The Shenandoah River in Clarke County from the Warren-Clarke County line to the Virginia line, a distance of approximately 21.6 miles, is hereby designated as the Shenandoah State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.7; 1985, cc. 346, 448; 1988, c. 891; 1992, c. 341; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries and appointments to the Shenandoah State Scenic River Advisory Board; redesignated former subsection D as present subsection B; and substituted “that” for “which” in the last paragraph of present subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Shenandoah State Scenic River”; and deleted former subsection B, which prohibited and defined “dams or other structures.”

§ 10.1-417.01.
(Effective July 1, 2022) North Fork of the Shenandoah State Scenic River.

The North Fork of the Shenandoah River in Shenandoah County, from Chapman Landing boat ramp in Edinburg, Virginia, to the downstream boundary of Seven Bends State Park, a distance of approximately 8.8 miles, is hereby designated as the North Fork of the Shenandoah State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2022, c. 661.

§ 10.1-417.1.
South State Scenic River.

The South River in the City of Waynesboro from South Oak Lane to Hopeman Parkway, a distance of approximately 6.5 miles, is hereby designated as the South State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 407.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 10.1-418.
Staunton State Scenic River.

The river, stream, or waterway known as the Staunton or the Roanoke, from State Route 761 at the Long Island Bridge to the Staunton River State Park boat landing, a distance of approximately 62.8 river miles, is hereby designated as the Staunton State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1984, c. 739, § 10-173.5; 1988, c. 891; 2001, c. 58; 2003, cc. 240, 687; 2018, c. 273; 2020, c. 320.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 58, in subsection A, substituted “State Route 360 to State Route 761 at the Long Island Bridge” for “river mile 49.9 at the Brookneal Public Landing to river mile 60.7 at the State Route 761 bridge,” and substituted “40.5” for “10.8,” and deleted the former second sentence of subsection A, which read: “River mile numbers are those used by the State Water Control Board beginning at the mouth of Buggs Island Lake.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted the subsection A designation; substituted “51.3” for “40.5”; and deleted former subsection B, concerning administration by the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries.

The 2003 amendment by c. 687 also substituted “51.3” for “40.5.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as” preceding “the Staunton State Scenic River.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 320, deleted “State Route 360 to” preceding “State Route 761,” inserted “to the Staunton River State Park boat landing” and substituted “62.8” for “51.3.”

§ 10.1-418.1.
North Meherrin State Scenic River.

The North Meherrin River in Lunenburg County from the Route 712 Bridge to the junction with the South Meherrin River, a distance of approximately 7.5 miles, is hereby designated as the North Meherrin State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

1997, cc. 45, 505; 2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 240 deleted the subsection A designation; and deleted former subsections B and C, concerning administration by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and appointments to the North Meherrin Scenic River Advisory Board.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the North Meherrin State Scenic River.”

§ 10.1-418.2.
St. Mary’s State Scenic River.

Because the authority of the federal government over the St. Mary’s River prevents the Commonwealth from legally including the river as a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System, the segment of the St. Mary’s River from its headwaters to the border of the George Washington National Forest, all on national forest property, is hereby recognized as one of Virginia’s Scenic River resources and is worthy of designation as such.

The Department shall consult with the Augusta County Board of Supervisors and the Supervisor of the George Washington National Forest on matters related to this scenic river.

History.

2003, c. 240; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 substituted “Because” for “As” at the beginning of subsection A; deleted former subsection B, which read “All land and water uses along this portion of the St. Mary’s River that are permitted by law shall not be restricted”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 10.1-418.3.
Meherrin State Scenic River.

The Meherrin River within Mecklenburg, Lunenburg, and Brunswick Counties from the confluence with the North Meherrin River, a designated scenic river, to the Brunswick/Greensville County line, a distance of approximately 54.8 miles, is hereby designated as the Meherrin State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2006, cc. 4, 44; 2013, c. 341; 2018, c. 273.

Editor’s note.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in Acts 2006, cc. 4 and 44, having been §

10.1-418.2

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 341 rewrote the section which read: “The Meherrin River within Brunswick County, a distance of approximately 37 miles, is hereby designated a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Meherrin State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.4.
North Mayo State Scenic River.

The North Mayo River in Henry County from the Route 695 crossing to the North Carolina line, a distance of approximately 7.1 miles, is hereby designated as the North Mayo State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2008, cc. 14, 336; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the North Mayo State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.5.
South Mayo State Scenic River.

The South Mayo River in Henry County from the Patrick County line to the North Carolina line, a distance of approximately 6.9 miles, is hereby designated as the South Mayo State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2008, cc. 14, 336; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the South Mayo State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.6.
Blackwater State Scenic River.

The Blackwater River in Isle of Wight and Southampton Counties and the Cities of Franklin and Suffolk, from Proctor’s Bridge at Route 621 to its confluence with the Nottoway River at the North Carolina line, a distance of approximately 56 miles, is hereby designated as the Blackwater State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2010, cc. 139, 308; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Blackwater State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, operating, or performing necessary maintenance on any transportation or public water supply project.”

§ 10.1-418.7.
Jordan State Scenic River.

The Jordan River in Rappahannock County, from the Route 522 bridge at Flint Hill to its confluence with the Rappahannock River, a distance of approximately seven miles, is hereby designated as the Jordan State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2010, c. 231; 2018, c. 273.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2010 act having been §

10.1-418.6

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Jordan State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.8.
Hughes State Scenic River.

The Hughes River in Culpeper, Madison, and Rappahannock Counties from the Shenandoah National Park line in Madison County to its confluence with the Hazel River, a distance of approximately 10 miles, is hereby designated as the Hughes State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2010, c. 232; 2018, c. 273.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2010 act having been §

10.1-418.6

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Hughes State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.9.
Tye State Scenic River.

The Tye River in Nelson County from Route 738 (Tye Depot Road) to its confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately 12.7 miles, is hereby designated as the Tye State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2014, c. 107; 2018, c. 273.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 273 inserted “as the Tye State Scenic River” and deleted the former second sentence, which read “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commonwealth or a local governing body from constructing, reconstructing, or performing necessary maintenance on any road or bridge.”

§ 10.1-418.10.
(Effective until July 1, 2022) Maury State Scenic River.

The Maury River in Rockbridge County from its origination at the confluence of the Calfpasture and Little Calfpasture Rivers to Furrs Mill Road bridge in Beans Bottom on Route 631, a distance of approximately 19.25 miles, is hereby designated as the Maury State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2020, cc. 403, 404.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 409 and 410 are identical, and substituted “the confluence with the James River” for “Furrs Mill Road bridge in Beans Bottom on Route 631” and “42.4 miles” for “19.25 miles.”

§ 10.1-418.10.
(Effective July 1, 2022) Maury State Scenic River.

The Maury River in Rockbridge County from its origination at the confluence of the Calfpasture and Little Calfpasture Rivers to the confluence with the James River, a distance of approximately 42.4 miles, is hereby designated as the Maury State Scenic River, a component of the Virginia Scenic Rivers System.

History.

2020, cc. 403, 404; 2022, cc. 409, 410.